Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8.9 Medical Assistance — Long-Term Care Service and Finance Reform

40-8.9-1.
Findings.

The number of Rhode Islanders in need of long-term-care services continues to rise substantially, and the quality of life of these Rhode Islanders is determined by the capacity of the long-term-care system to provide access to the full array of services and supports required to meet their healthcare needs and maintain their independence.

It is in the interest of all Rhode Islanders to endorse and fund statewide efforts to build a fiscally sound, dynamic long-term-care system that supports: consumer independence and choice; the delivery of high-quality, coordinated services; the financial integrity of all participants-purchasers, payers, providers, and consumers; and the responsible and efficient allocation of all available public and private resources.

It is in the interest of all Rhode Islanders to assure that rates paid for community-based long-term-care services are adequate to assure high quality as well as supportive of workforce recruitment and retention.

It is in the interest of all Rhode Islanders to improve consumers’ access information regarding community-based alternatives to institutional settings of care.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 286, § 1.

40-8.9-2.
System reform and rebalancing goal.

On or before July 1, 2007, the department of human services shall begin to implement a model system for integrated long-term care, that expands the capacity of the long-term-care system as a whole to support consumer choice and independence; enables consumers to access coordinated services; ensures quality outcomes through certification standards, performance measures, and incentives and rewards that promote service excellence and generates the information consumers need to make reasoned choices about their health care; and improves the system’s overall stability by reinvesting the benefits that accrue from the more efficient utilization of services to enhance the capacity of each of its component parts. Attaining systemwide reform of the magnitude set forth herein will require rebalancing the system by making significant changes in the organization, financing, and delivery of services that must be implemented incrementally.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 223, § 1.

40-8.9-3.
Least-restrictive setting requirement.

The executive office of health and human services (executive office) is directed to recommend the allocation of existing Medicaid resources as needed to ensure that those in need of long-term-care and support services receive them in the least-restrictive setting appropriate to their needs and preferences. The executive office is hereby authorized to utilize screening criteria to avoid unnecessary institutionalization of persons during the full eligibility-determination process for Medicaid community-based care.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 7, § 5.

40-8.9-4.
Unified long-term care budget.

Beginning on July 1, 2007, a unified long-term-care budget shall combine in a single, line-item appropriation within the executive office of health and human services (executive office), annual executive office Medicaid appropriations for nursing facility and community-based, long-term-care services for elderly sixty-five (65) years and older and younger persons at risk of nursing home admissions (including adult day care, home health, PACE, and personal care in assisted-living settings). Beginning on July 1, 2007, the total system savings attributable to the value of the reduction in nursing home days including hospice nursing home days paid for by Medicaid shall be allocated in the budget enacted by the general assembly for the ensuing fiscal year for the express purpose of promoting and strengthening community-based alternatives; provided, further, beginning July 1, 2009, said savings shall be allocated within the budgets of the executive office and, as appropriate, the department of human services, office of healthy aging. The allocation shall include, but not be limited to, funds to support an ongoing, statewide community education and outreach program to provide the public with information on home and community services and the establishment of presumptive eligibility criteria for the purposes of accessing home and community care. The home- and community-care service presumptive eligibility criteria shall be developed through rule or regulation on or before September 30, 2007. The allocation may also be used to fund home and community services provided by the office of healthy aging for persons eligible for Medicaid long-term care, and the co-pay program administered pursuant to chapter 66.3 of title 42. Any monies in the allocation that remain unexpended in a fiscal year shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year for the express purpose of strengthening community-based alternatives.

The caseload estimating conference pursuant to §

35-17-1

shall determine the amount of general revenues to be added to the current service estimate of community-based, long-term-care services for elderly sixty-five (65) and older and younger persons at risk of nursing home admissions for the ensuing budget year by multiplying the combined, cost per day of nursing home and hospice nursing home days estimated at the caseload conference for that year by the reduction in nursing home and hospice nursing home days from those in the second fiscal year prior to the current fiscal year to those in the first fiscal year prior to the current fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 5, § 8; P.L. 2009, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 7, § 5.

40-8.9-5.
Administration and regulations.

The single state agency designated to administer the Rhode Island Medicaid program is hereby directed and authorized to develop and submit any requests for waivers, demonstration projects, grants and state plan amendments or regulations that may be considered necessary and appropriate to support the general purposes and specific requirements of this statute. The requests shall be made in consultation with any affected departments and, to the extent feasible, any consumer group, advisory body, or other entity designated for such purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 223, § 1.

40-8.9-6.
Recognizing long-term reform performance — Reporting.

Annual performance reports showing progress in long-term-care system reform and rebalancing shall be submitted by April 1 of each year by the executive office of health and human services to the finance committees of both the senate and the house of representatives and the long-term care coordinating council and shall include:

The number of Medicaid-eligible persons aged sixty-five (65) years and over and adults with disabilities served in nursing facilities;

The number of Medicaid-eligible persons aged sixty-five (65) years and over and adults with disabilities transitioned from nursing homes to Medicaid-supported home- and community-based care;

The number of persons aged sixty-five (65) years and over and adults with disabilities served in Medicaid and office of healthy aging home and community care, to include home care, adult day services, assisted living, the personal choice program, the program of all-inclusive care of the elderly (PACE) and shared living;

The dollar amounts and percent of expenditures spent on nursing facility care and home- and community-based care for those aged sixty-five (65) years and over and adults with disabilities and the average cost of care for nursing facility care and home- and community-based care;

The amount of savings attributed to the value of the reduction in nursing home days, including hospice nursing home days paid for by Medicaid in accordance with §

40-8.9-4

, and how the savings, if any, are allocated in the current fiscal year and in the proposed budget for the ensuing fiscal year to promote and strengthen community-based alternatives; and

Estimates of the continued investments necessary to provide stability to the existing system and establish the infrastructure and programs required to achieve systemwide reform and the targeted goal of spending fifty percent (50%) of Medicaid long-term-care dollars on nursing facility care and fifty percent (50%) on home- and community-based services.

Beginning in 2019, to measure and show progress in achieving the state’s goals for long-term services and supports reform, the executive office of health and human services shall develop and make public on its website a long-term services and supports performance scorecard based on the measures detailed in subsections (a)(1) through (a)(5) of this section showing data for the most recent four-year (4) period.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 5; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 7, § 5; P.L. 2018, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 255, § 1.

40-8.9-7.
Rate reform.

The executive office of health and human services shall design, and require to be submitted by all service providers, cost reports for all community-based, long-term services, including patient liability owed and collected.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 7, § 5.

40-8.9-8.
System screening.

The executive office of health and human services shall develop and implement a screening strategy for the purpose of identifying entrants to the publicly financed, long-term-care system prior to application for eligibility as well as defining their potential service needs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 7, § 5.

40-8.9-9.
Long-term-care rebalancing system reform goal.

Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, the executive office of health and human services is authorized and directed to apply for, and obtain, any necessary waiver(s), waiver amendment(s), and/or state-plan amendments from the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, and to promulgate rules necessary to adopt an affirmative plan of program design and implementation that addresses the goal of allocating a minimum of fifty percent (50%) of Medicaid long-term-care funding for persons aged sixty-five (65) and over and adults with disabilities, in addition to services for persons with developmental disabilities, to home- and community-based care; provided, further, the executive office shall report annually as part of its budget submission, the percentage distribution between institutional care and home- and community-based care by population and shall report current and projected waiting lists for long-term-care and home- and community-based care services. The executive office is further authorized and directed to prioritize investments in home- and community-based care and to maintain the integrity and financial viability of all current long-term-care services while pursuing this goal.

The reformed long-term-care system rebalancing goal is person-centered and encourages individual self-determination, family involvement, interagency collaboration, and individual choice through the provision of highly specialized and individually tailored home-based services. Additionally, individuals with severe behavioral, physical, or developmental disabilities must have the opportunity to live safe and healthful lives through access to a wide range of supportive services in an array of community-based settings, regardless of the complexity of their medical condition, the severity of their disability, or the challenges of their behavior. Delivery of services and supports in less-costly and less-restrictive community settings will enable children, adolescents, and adults to be able to curtail, delay, or avoid lengthy stays in long-term-care institutions, such as behavioral health residential-treatment facilities, long-term-care hospitals, intermediate-care facilities, and/or skilled nursing facilities.

Pursuant to federal authority procured under §

42-7.2-16

, the executive office of health and human services is directed and authorized to adopt a tiered set of criteria to be used to determine eligibility for services. The criteria shall be developed in collaboration with the state’s health and human services departments and, to the extent feasible, any consumer group, advisory board, or other entity designated for these purposes, and shall encompass eligibility determinations for long-term-care services in nursing facilities, hospitals, and intermediate-care facilities for persons with intellectual disabilities, as well as home- and community-based alternatives, and shall provide a common standard of income eligibility for both institutional and home- and community-based care. The executive office is authorized to adopt clinical and/or functional criteria for admission to a nursing facility, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities that are more stringent than those employed for access to home- and community-based services. The executive office is also authorized to promulgate rules that define the frequency of re-assessments for services provided for under this section. Levels of care may be applied in accordance with the following:

The executive office shall continue to apply the level-of-care criteria in effect on June 30, 2015, for any recipient determined eligible for and receiving Medicaid-funded long-term services and supports in a nursing facility, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities on or before that date, unless:

The recipient transitions to home- and community-based services because he or she would no longer meet the level-of-care criteria in effect on June 30, 2015; or

The recipient chooses home- and community-based services over the nursing facility, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities. For the purposes of this section, a failed community placement, as defined in regulations promulgated by the executive office, shall be considered a condition of clinical eligibility for the highest level of care. The executive office shall confer with the long-term-care ombudsperson with respect to the determination of a failed placement under the ombudsperson’s jurisdiction. Should any Medicaid recipient eligible for a nursing facility, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities as of June 30, 2015, receive a determination of a failed community placement, the recipient shall have access to the highest level of care; furthermore, a recipient who has experienced a failed community placement shall be transitioned back into his or her former nursing home, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities whenever possible. Additionally, residents shall only be moved from a nursing home, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities in a manner consistent with applicable state and federal laws.

Any Medicaid recipient eligible for the highest level of care who voluntarily leaves a nursing home, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities shall not be subject to any wait list for home- and community-based services.

No nursing home, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities shall be denied payment for services rendered to a Medicaid recipient on the grounds that the recipient does not meet level-of-care criteria unless and until the executive office has:

Performed an individual assessment of the recipient at issue and provided written notice to the nursing home, hospital, or intermediate-care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities that the recipient does not meet level-of-care criteria; and

The recipient has either appealed that level-of-care determination and been unsuccessful, or any appeal period available to the recipient regarding that level-of-care determination has expired.

The executive office is further authorized to consolidate all home- and community-based services currently provided pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396n into a single system of home- and community-based services that include options for consumer direction and shared living. The resulting single home- and community-based services system shall replace and supersede all 42 U.S.C. § 1396n programs when fully implemented. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the resulting single program home- and community-based services system shall include the continued funding of assisted-living services at any assisted-living facility financed by the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation prior to January 1, 2006, and shall be in accordance with chapter 66.8 of title 42 as long as assisted-living services are a covered Medicaid benefit.

The executive office is authorized to promulgate rules that permit certain optional services including, but not limited to, homemaker services, home modifications, respite, and physical therapy evaluations to be offered to persons at risk for Medicaid-funded long-term care subject to availability of state-appropriated funding for these purposes.

To promote the expansion of home- and community-based service capacity, the executive office is authorized to pursue payment methodology reforms that increase access to homemaker, personal care (home health aide), assisted living, adult supportive-care homes, and adult day services, as follows:

Development of revised or new Medicaid certification standards that increase access to service specialization and scheduling accommodations by using payment strategies designed to achieve specific quality and health outcomes.

Development of Medicaid certification standards for state-authorized providers of adult day services, excluding providers of services authorized under §

40.1-24-1(3)

, assisted living, and adult supportive care (as defined under chapter 17.24 of title 23) that establish for each, an acuity-based, tiered service and payment methodology tied to: licensure authority; level of beneficiary needs; the scope of services and supports provided; and specific quality and outcome measures.

The standards for adult day services for persons eligible for Medicaid-funded long-term services may differ from those who do not meet the clinical/functional criteria set forth in §

40-8.10-3

.

As the state’s Medicaid program seeks to assist more beneficiaries requiring long-term services and supports in home- and community-based settings, the demand for home-care workers has increased, and wages for these workers has not kept pace with neighboring states, leading to high turnover and vacancy rates in the state’s home-care industry, the executive office shall institute a one-time increase in the base-payment rates for FY 2019, as described below, for home-care service providers to promote increased access to and an adequate supply of highly trained home-healthcare professionals, in amount to be determined by the appropriations process, for the purpose of raising wages for personal care attendants and home health aides to be implemented by such providers.

A prospective base adjustment, effective not later than July 1, 2018, of ten percent (10%) of the current base rate for home-care providers, home nursing care providers, and hospice providers contracted with the executive office of health and human services and its subordinate agencies to deliver Medicaid fee-for-service personal care attendant services.

A prospective base adjustment, effective not later than July 1, 2018, of twenty percent (20%) of the current base rate for home-care providers, home nursing care providers, and hospice providers contracted with the executive office of health and human services and its subordinate agencies to deliver Medicaid fee-for-service skilled nursing and therapeutic services and hospice care.

Effective upon passage of this section, hospice provider reimbursement, exclusively for room and board expenses for individuals residing in a skilled nursing facility, shall revert to the rate methodology in effect on June 30, 2018, and these room and board expenses shall be exempted from any and all annual rate increases to hospice providers as provided for in this section.

On the first of July in each year, beginning on July 1, 2019, the executive office of health and human services will initiate an annual inflation increase to the base rate for home-care providers, home nursing care providers, and hospice providers contracted with the executive office and its subordinate agencies to deliver Medicaid fee-for-service personal care attendant services, skilled nursing and therapeutic services and hospice care. The base rate increase shall be a percentage amount equal to the New England Consumer Price Index card as determined by the United States Department of Labor for medical care and for compliance with all federal and state laws, regulations, and rules, and all national accreditation program requirements.

As the state’s Medicaid program seeks to assist more beneficiaries requiring long-term services and supports in home- and community-based settings, the demand for home-care workers has increased, and wages for these workers has not kept pace with neighboring states, leading to high turnover and vacancy rates in the state’s home-care industry. To promote increased access to and an adequate supply of direct-care workers, the executive office shall institute a payment methodology change, in Medicaid fee-for-service and managed care, for FY 2022, that shall be passed through directly to the direct-care workers’ wages who are employed by home nursing care and home-care providers licensed by the Rhode Island department of health, as described below:

Effective July 1, 2021, increase the existing shift differential modifier by $0.19 per fifteen (15) minutes for personal care and combined personal care/homemaker.

Employers must pass on one hundred percent (100%) of the shift differential modifier increase per fifteen-minute (15) unit of service to the CNAs who rendered such services. This compensation shall be provided in addition to the rate of compensation that the employee was receiving as of June 30, 2021. For an employee hired after June 30, 2021, the agency shall use not less than the lowest compensation paid to an employee of similar functions and duties as of June 30, 2021, as the base compensation to which the increase is applied.

Employers must provide to EOHHS an annual compliance statement showing wages as of June 30, 2021, amounts received from the increases outlined herein, and compliance with this section by July 1, 2022. EOHHS may adopt any additional necessary regulations and processes to oversee this subsection.

Effective January 1, 2022, establish a new behavioral healthcare enhancement of $0.39 per fifteen (15) minutes for personal care, combined personal care/homemaker, and homemaker only for providers who have at least thirty percent (30%) of their direct-care workers (which includes certified nursing assistants (CNA) and homemakers) certified in behavioral healthcare training.

Employers must pass on one hundred percent (100%) of the behavioral healthcare enhancement per fifteen (15) minute unit of service rendered by only those CNAs and homemakers who have completed the thirty (30) hour behavioral health certificate training program offered by Rhode Island College, or a training program that is prospectively determined to be compliant per EOHHS, to those CNAs and homemakers. This compensation shall be provided in addition to the rate of compensation that the employee was receiving as of December 31, 2021. For an employee hired after December 31, 2021, the agency shall use not less than the lowest compensation paid to an employee of similar functions and duties as of December 31, 2021, as the base compensation to which the increase is applied.

By January 1, 2023, employers must provide to EOHHS an annual compliance statement showing wages as of December 31, 2021, amounts received from the increases outlined herein, and compliance with this section, including which behavioral healthcare training programs were utilized. EOHHS may adopt any additional necessary regulations and processes to oversee this subsection.

The executive office shall implement a long-term-care-options counseling program to provide individuals, or their representatives, or both, with long-term-care consultations that shall include, at a minimum, information about: long-term-care options, sources, and methods of both public and private payment for long-term-care services and an assessment of an individual’s functional capabilities and opportunities for maximizing independence. Each individual admitted to, or seeking admission to, a long-term-care facility, regardless of the payment source, shall be informed by the facility of the availability of the long-term-care-options counseling program and shall be provided with long-term-care-options consultation if they so request. Each individual who applies for Medicaid long-term-care services shall be provided with a long-term-care consultation.

The executive office is also authorized, subject to availability of appropriation of funding, and federal, Medicaid-matching funds, to pay for certain services and supports necessary to transition or divert beneficiaries from institutional or restrictive settings and optimize their health and safety when receiving care in a home or the community. The secretary is authorized to obtain any state plan or waiver authorities required to maximize the federal funds available to support expanded access to home- and community-transition and stabilization services; provided, however, payments shall not exceed an annual or per-person amount.

To ensure persons with long-term-care needs who remain living at home have adequate resources to deal with housing maintenance and unanticipated housing-related costs, the secretary is authorized to develop higher resource eligibility limits for persons or obtain any state plan or waiver authorities necessary to change the financial eligibility criteria for long-term services and supports to enable beneficiaries receiving home and community waiver services to have the resources to continue living in their own homes or rental units or other home-based settings.

The executive office shall implement, no later than January 1, 2016, the following home- and community-based service and payment reforms:

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 12, § 6.]

Adult day services level of need criteria and acuity-based, tiered-payment methodology; and

Payment reforms that encourage home- and community-based providers to provide the specialized services and accommodations beneficiaries need to avoid or delay institutional care.

The secretary is authorized to seek any Medicaid section 1115 waiver or state-plan amendments and take any administrative actions necessary to ensure timely adoption of any new or amended rules, regulations, policies, or procedures and any system enhancements or changes, for which appropriations have been authorized, that are necessary to facilitate implementation of the requirements of this section by the dates established. The secretary shall reserve the discretion to exercise the authority established under §§

42-7.2-5(6)(v)

and

42-7.2-6.1

, in consultation with the governor, to meet the legislative directives established herein.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 17, § 8; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 22, § 6; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 10; P.L. 2008, ch. 69, § 6; P.L. 2009, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 20, § 5; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 16; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 7, § 5; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 19; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 9, § 5; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 13, § 4; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 8; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 12, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.